Maine, session 132, LD1525.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §1849, sub-§1, ¶B is enacted to read:
B. Upon written request from a firewood bank, the bureau may donate timber for use
as firewood to the firewood bank if the following conditions are met:
(1) The director determines that sufficient funds are available in the Public
Reserved Lands Management Fund in subsection 2;
(2) Any harvest and trucking fees are paid for or reimbursed by the firewood bank;
and
(3) All contractual requirements of the harvest operation from which timber is
donated are met.
For purposes of this paragraph, "firewood bank" means an organization that purchases
or accepts donations of firewood and makes available firewood free of charge to
individuals and families in need of heating assistance.
Sec. 2. Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Bureau of
Forestry to promote firewood banks. The Department of Agriculture, Conservation
and Forestry, Bureau of Forestry shall promote the development and public awareness of
firewood banks in this State. For purposes of this section, "firewood bank" has the same
meaning as in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 12, section 1849, subsection 1, paragraph
B. The bureau shall develop and dispense informational resources to promote the
successful operation of firewood banks in this State. In fulfilling its obligations under this
section, the bureau may collaborate with the University of Maine System. The bureau
shall:
1. Provide information to the public for the purpose of increasing awareness of the
resources available at firewood banks and the charitable efforts needed to maintain
firewood banks in this State; and
2. Develop and maintain on the bureau's publicly accessible website a list of all
firewood banks operating in the State.
Page 1 - 132LR1981(03)